Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.10, subdivision 2e, is amended to read: Subd. 2e. Local optional revenue. new text begin (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the total local optional revenue allowance equals $724. For fiscal year 2028 and later, the total local optional revenue allowance equals the product of: new text end new text begin (1) $920; and new text end new text begin (2) the greater of one or the ratio of (i) the formula allowance under subdivision 2 for that fiscal year to (ii) the formula allowance under subdivision 2 for fiscal year 2028, rounded to the nearest whole dollar. new text end new text begin The first tier local optional revenue allowance equals $300. The second tier local optional revenue allowance equals the total local optional revenue allowance minus the first tier local optional revenue allowance. new text end deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Local optional revenue for a school district equals the sum of the district's first tier local optional revenue and second tier local optional revenue. A district's first tier local optional revenue equals deleted text begin $300deleted text end new text begin the first tier local optional revenue allowancenew text end times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year. A district's second tier local optional revenue equals deleted text begin $424deleted text end new text begin the second tier local optional revenue allowancenew text end times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end A district's local optional levy equals the sum of the first tier local optional levy and the second tier local optional levy. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A district's first tier local optional levy equals the district's first tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $880,000. deleted text begin (d) For fiscal year 2023, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $548,842. For fiscal year 2024, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $510,000.deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end For fiscal year 2025, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $626,450. For fiscal year 2026, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $642,038. For fiscal year 2027 and later, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $671,345. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The local optional levy must be spread on referendum market value. A district may levy less than the permitted amount. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A district's local optional aid equals its local optional revenue minus its local optional levy. If a district's actual levy for first or second tier local optional revenue is less than its maximum levy limit for that tier, its aid must be proportionately reduced. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end